Hawaii, session 2025, HB628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Act 124, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015, authorized the department of education to continue, until June 30, 2020, awarding high school diplomas to veterans who did not receive a high school diploma as a result of compulsory induction into active service in the armed services or any person whose high school education was interrupted due to wartime practices. The purpose of this Act is to authorize the department of education to award high school diplomas to persons who did not receive a high school diploma as a result of compulsory or voluntary induction into active service in the armed services of the United States and any person whose high school education was interrupted due to wartime practices during World War II, the Korean War, or the Vietnam War. SECTION 2.  Chapter 302A, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part II, subpart C, to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§302A-     High school diploma; armed services veterans; persons impacted by wartime activities.  (a)  The department is authorized to establish a program to award a high school diploma to any person who: (1)  Was a resident of the State or Territory of Hawaii; (2)  While enrolled in a high school in the State or Territory of Hawaii was compulsorily or voluntarily inducted into active service in the armed services of the United States between: (A)  December 1, 1941, and August 30, 1945; (B)  June 1, 1950, and July 31, 1953; or (C)  August 1, 1964, and January 31, 1973; and (3)  Did not complete a high school curriculum and receive a high school diploma. (b)  The department may also award a high school diploma to any person whose high school education was interrupted due to wartime practices during World War II, the Korean War, or the Vietnam War. (c)  Applicants shall submit to the department, on forms prescribed by the department, information establishing eligibility for the award of a high school diploma under this section." SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________